bg-BG: Съвместим стандарт за сертификация на каската: DOT; ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM; Не е приложимо; Каски с SHARP рейтинг; Snell; Друго
sl-SI: Standard certificiranja združljivih čelad: DOT; ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM; Ni primerno; Čelade z oceno SHARP; Snell; Drugo
hr-HR: Standard certifikacije kompatibilne kacige: DOT; ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM; Nije primjenjivo; Kacige s ocjenom SHARP; Snell; Ostalo
sv: Certifieringsstandard för kompatibel hjälm: DOT; ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM; Ej tillämpligt; SHARP-klassade hjälmar; Snell; Övrigt
en: Compatible helmet certification standard: DOT; ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM; Not applicable; SHARP rated helmets; Snell; Other
lt-LT: Suderinamas šalmo sertifikavimo standartas: DOT; ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM; Netaikoma; SHARP įvertinti šalmai; Snell; Kita
nb: Standard for kompatibel hjelmsertifisering: DOT; ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM; Ikke aktuelt; SHARP-klassifiserte hjelmer; Snell; Annet
da: Standard for kompatibel hjelmcertificering: DOT; ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM; Ikke relevant; Hjelme med SHARP-klassificering; Snell; Andet
hu: Kompatibilis sisak tanúsítási szabvány: DOT; ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM; Nem alkalmazható; SHARP-értékelésű sisakok; Snell; Egyéb
el: Πρότυπο πιστοποίησης συμβατού κράνους: DOT; ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM; Δεν ισχύει; Κράνη με πιστοποίηση SHARP; Snell; Άλλο
zh-TW: 相容的頭盔認證標準: DOT; ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM; 不適用; SHARP 評級安全帽; Snell; 其他
cs: Kompatibilní certifikační standard přilby: DOT; ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM; Nevztahuje se; Přilby s hodnocením SHARP; Snell; Jiné
pt-PT: Norma de certificação de capacete compatível: DOT; ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM; Não aplicável; Capacetes com classificação SHARP; Snell; Outro
ko: 호환 헬멧 인증 표준: DOT; ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM; 해당 없음; SHARP 등급 헬멧; Snell; 기타
pt-BR: Padrão de certificação de capacete compatível: DOT; ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM; Não aplicável; Capacetes com classificação SHARP; Snell; Outro
tr: Uyumlu kask sertifikasyon standardı: DOT; ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM; Geçerli değil; SHARP dereceli kasklar; Snell; Diğer
ru: Совместимый стандарт сертификации шлема: DOT; ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM; Неприменимо; Шлемы с рейтингом SHARP; Snell; Другое
vi: Tiêu chuẩn chứng nhận mũ bảo hiểm tương thích: DOT; ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM; Không áp dụng; Mũ bảo hiểm đạt chuẩn SHARP; Snell; Khác
fr: Norme de certification de casque compatible: DOT; ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM; Non applicable; Casques certifiés SHARP; Snell; Autre
fi: Yhteensopivan kypärän sertifiointistandardi: DOT; ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM; Ei sovelleta; SHARP-luokitellut kypärät; Snell; Muu
ro-RO: Standard de certificare pentru cască compatibil: DOT; ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM; Nu se aplică; Căști cu evaluare SHARP; Snell; Altele
nl: Compatibele helm certificeringsnorm: DOT; ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM; Niet van toepassing; SHARP-gecertificeerde helmen; Snell; Overig
ja: 互換性のあるヘルメット認証規格: DOT; ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM; 該当なし; SHARP評価ヘルメット; Snell; その他
de: Kompatibler Helmzertifizierungsstandard: DOT; ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM; Nicht zutreffend; SHARP-zertifizierte Helme; Snell; Sonstige
sk-SK: Norma certifikácie kompatibilnej prilby: DOT; ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM; Neuplatňuje sa; Prilby s hodnotením SHARP; Snell; Iné
pl: Kompatybilna norma certyfikacji kasku: DOT; ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM; Nie dotyczy; Kaski z oceną SHARP; Snell; Inne
es: Estándar de certificación de cascos compatible: DOT; ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM; No aplicable; Cascos con clasificación SHARP; Snell; Otro
it: Standard di certificazione del casco compatibile: DOT; ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM; Non applicabile; Caschi con classificazione SHARP; Snell; Altro
zh-CN: 适配的头盔认证标准: DOT; ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM; 不适用; SHARP 评级头盔; Snell; 其他
th: มาตรฐานการรับรองหมวกกันน็อกที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: DOT; ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIM; ไม่เกี่ยวข้อง; หมวกกันน็อกมาตรฐาน SHARP; Snell; อื่นๆ